Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5331.
peoplE of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 261g. (1) Subject to subsections (2) to (4), a public entity shall not purchase or operate a drone manufactured in whole or in part by a company that is named on any of the following lists: (a) The United States Department of Defense list of companies published under section 1260H of the William M. (Mac) Thornberry national defense authorization act for fiscal year 2021, Public Law 116ï¿½283. (b) The United States Department of Treasury's Chinese Military-Industrial Complex Sanction List published under 31 CFR part 586. (c) The United States Department of Commerce Bureau of Industry and Security's Entity List published as 15 CFR part 744, supplement 4. (2) Subsection (1) applies as follows: (a) Beginning 2 years after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section, a public entity shall not purchase a drone prohibited under subsection (1). (b) Beginning 5 years after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section, a public entity shall not operate a drone prohibited under subsection (1). (3) A public entity may operate a drone prohibited under this section if the governor declares a state of emergency or state of disaster and operating that drone would assist the public entity in responding to that state of emergency or state of disaster. (4) This section does not apply to a drone that is a small unmanned aircraft system procured, purchased, operated, or deployed in compliance with section 16 of the unmanned aircraft systems act, 2016 PA 436, MCL 259.316. (5) As used in this section, "public entity" means any of the following: (a) A state agency, unit of local government, university, or community college. (b) An entity that receives money from a state agency or unit of local government. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 5330 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.